Rhode Island, session 2026, HB7838.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 5-31.1-22 of the General Laws in Chapter 5-31.1 entitled "Dentists
and Dental Hygienists" is hereby amended to read as follows:
5-31.1-22. Limited registrations.
(a) An applicant for limited registration under this chapter who furnishes the board with
satisfactory proof that the applicant is eighteen (18) years of age or older and of good moral
character, that the applicant has graduated from a dental school accredited by the American Dental
Association Commission on Dental Accreditation or its designated agency and approved by the
board, and that the applicant has been appointed an intern, resident, fellow, or dental officer in a
hospital or other institution maintained by the state, or by a city or town, or in a hospital or clinic
that is incorporated under the laws of this state or in a clinic that is affiliated with a hospital licensed
by the department of health, or in an outpatient clinic operated by the state, may, upon the payment
as set forth in § 23-1-54, be registered by the board as a hospital dental officer for any time that the
board prescribes; but that limited registration entitles the applicant to practice dentistry in the
hospital or other institution designated on his or her certificate of limited registration, or outside
that hospital or other institution for the treatment, under the supervision of one of its dental officers
who is a licensed dentist, in the state of persons accepted by it as patients, or in any hospital,
institution, clinic, or program affiliated for training purposes with the hospital, institution, or clinic
designated on this certificate, which affiliation is approved by the board, and in any case under

regulations established by that hospital, institution, or clinic. Each hospital, institution, or clinic
shall annually submit to the board a list of training programs that comply with the terms of this
section. Limited registration under this section may be revoked at any time by the board. The board
and/or the director may promulgate any rules and regulations that it deems necessary to carry out
the provisions of this section.
(b) Foreign-trained dentists are eligible for limited licenses as described in the rules and
regulations pertaining to dentists, dental hygienists, and dental assistants (216-RICR-40-05-2),
provided they have graduated from a reputable dental college, are under the supervision of a
supervising dentist, and have passed an examination as determined by the board of examiners in
dentistry.
(c) Foreign-trained dental hygienists are eligible for limited licenses as described in the
rules and regulations pertaining to dentists, dental hygienists, and dental assistants (216-RICR-40-
05-2), provided they have graduated from a reputable dental hygiene college, are under the
supervision of a supervising dentist, and have passed an examination as determined by the board
of examiners in dentistry.
(d) Limited registration under this section may be revoked at any time by the director of
the department of health or by the board.
(e) A dental college shall be considered reputable which possesses the following
qualifications:
(1) It shall be incorporated and authorized by its charter to confer degrees of doctor of
dental medicine, doctor of dental surgery, or doctor of dental science;
(2) It shall have a competent faculty and corps of instructors. The teaching staff shall
deliver a comprehensive and satisfactory course of lectures supplemented by adequate clinical and
laboratory exercises in all subjects pertaining to modern dentistry;
(3) It shall give a course of not less than four (4) separate academic years to matriculants
who are graduates of accredited high schools or who present proof of equivalent training, or a
course of not less than three (3) separate academic years to matriculants who present satisfactory
proof of having successfully completed two (2) years of appropriate pre-dental training in a college
or university authorized to grant degrees. Each academic year shall consist of not less than thirty-
two (32) weeks; and
(4) The administrative policy of the dental college shall be such as to accomplish the
requirements of this section.
(f) A dental hygiene college shall be considered reputable which possesses the following
qualifications:
LC005785 - Page 2 of 4

(1) It shall be incorporated and authorized by its charter to confer, at a minimum, an
associate degree in dental hygiene;
(2) It shall have a competent faculty and corps of instructors. The teaching staff shall
deliver a comprehensive and satisfactory course of lectures supplemented by adequate clinical and
laboratory exercises in all subjects pertaining to modern dental hygiene;
(3) It shall give a course of not less than two (2) separate academic years to matriculants
who are graduates of accredited high schools or who present proof of equivalent training. Each
academic year shall consist of not less than thirty-two (32) weeks; and
(4) The administrative policy of the dental hygiene college shall be such as to accomplish
the requirements of this section.
(g) The board and/or the director shall promulgate any rules and regulations that the board
or the director deems necessary to implement the provisions of this section.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC005785
========
LC005785 - Page 3 of 4